California, session 20252026, AB2079.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 51299.1 of the Government Code is amended to read:51299.1. For purposes of this chapter:(a) “Adaptive reuse investment incentive funds” means, with respect to a qualified adaptive reuse project property for a relevant fiscal year, an amount up to or equal to the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated to the participating local agency, excluding the revenue transfers required by Sections 97.2 and 97.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, from the taxation of that portion of the total assessed value of the real and personal property of an adaptive reuse project property that is in excess of the qualified adaptive reuse project property’s valuation at the time of the proponent’s initial request for funding.(b) “Program” means an adaptive reuse investment incentive program established pursuant to Section 51299.2.(c) (1) “Proponent” means a party or parties that meet all of the following criteria:(A) The party is named in the application for a permit to construct a qualified adaptive reuse project submitted to the city or county.(B) The party will be the fee owner of the qualified adaptive reuse project property upon the completion of that development.(2) If a proponent that is receiving adaptive reuse investment incentive amounts subsequently leases the qualified adaptive reuse project property to another party, the lease may provide for the payment to that lessee of any portion of adaptive reuse investment incentive funds. A lessee that receives any portion of adaptive reuse investment incentive funds shall also be considered a proponent for the purposes of this chapter.(d) (1) “Qualified adaptive reuse project property” means an adaptive reuse project proposed pursuant to Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 65658) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 that is located within the city or county.(2) “Qualified adaptive reuse project property” includes an adaptive reuse project proposed pursuant to Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 65658) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7, notwithstanding the project’s compliance with affordability criteria under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 65658.5 or labor standards under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 65658.6, and Sections 65658.12 to 65658.15, inclusive, that is located within the city or county.SEC. 2. Section 51299.2 of the Government Code is amended to read:51299.2. (a) Commencing in the 2026–27 fiscal year, the governing body of a city or county, or city and county, may, by ordinance or resolution, establish an adaptive reuse investment incentive program pursuant to this chapter.(b) (1) A city or county, or city and county, that establishes a program shall, upon the approval by a majority of the entire membership of its governing body of a written request therefor, pay adaptive reuse investment incentive funds to the proponent of a qualified adaptive reuse project property to subsidize the affordable housing units, as required pursuant to Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 65658) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7, or to subsidize the project’s housing units, for up to 30 consecutive fiscal years. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a city or county, or city and county, from paying adaptive reuse investment incentive funds to a proponent pursuant to this paragraph for a period of fewer than 30 years.(2) A request for the payment of adaptive reuse investment incentive funds shall be filed by a proponent in writing with the governing body of the city or county in the time and manner established by that governing body.(c) After a city or county, or city and county, approves a request for the payment of adaptive reuse investment incentive funds, payment of adaptive reuse investment incentive funds shall begin with the first fiscal year that commences after the qualified adaptive reuse property is issued a certificate of occupancy. If the city or county, or city and county, does not issue certificates of occupancy, the final inspection of the qualified adaptive reuse project property shall serve as the certificate of occupancy for purposes of this subdivision.SEC. 3. Section 51299.3 of the Government Code is amended to read:51299.3. A city or special district may pay to the city or county, or city and county, an amount equal to the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated to that city or special district, but not the actual allocation, derived from the taxation of that portion of the total assessed value of that real property that is in excess of the property’s valuation at the time of the proponent’s initial request for funding, for the purpose of subsidizing the affordable housing units required pursuant to Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 65658) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7. 7, or for the purpose of subsidizing the project’s housing units.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to advance adaptive reuse policies to revitalize California downtown areas.